Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.030

Public funds investment account.

There is created a trust fund to be known as the public funds investment account. The account is to be separately accounted for and invested by the state treasurer. All moneys remitted for pooled investment under this chapter shall be deposited in this account. All earnings on any balances in the public funds investment account, less moneys for administration pursuant to RCW 43.250.060, shall be credited to the public funds investment account.

[ 2019 c 163 s 2; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 86; 1990 c 106 s 2; 1986 c 294 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.